Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.170

Commission—Powers.

The commission shall make recommendations to the supreme court on matters pertaining to the publication of such decisions, in both temporary and permanent forms. The commission shall by July 1, 1997, develop a policy that ensures that if any material prepared pursuant to RCW 2.32.110 is licensed for resale, the material is made available for licensing to all commercial resellers on an equal and nonexclusive basis.

[ 1995 c 257 s 2; 1943 c 185 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 11071-2. Prior: 1921 c 162 s 1; 1919 c 117 ss 1-3; 1905 c 167 s 5.]